Hawaii statutes.
[§11-435] Report and recommendation.
In January of each year, the commission shall submit to the legislature:

(1) A study and recommendations of reasonable
campaign expenditure and contribution limits and the factors which may be
relevant in their establishment; and

(2) A report concerning the status of the Hawaii
election [campaign] fund. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next